Washington statutes.
RCW 14.20.060

Payment of fees—Fund—Possession and display of licenses and certificates.

The fees set forth in RCW 14.20.050 shall be paid to the secretary. The fee for any calendar year may be paid on and after the first day of December of the preceding year. The secretary shall give appropriate receipts therefor. The fees collected under this chapter shall be credited to the aeronautics account. The secretary may prescribe requirements for the possession and exhibition of aircraft dealer's licenses and aircraft dealer's certificates.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 25 s 48; 1998 c 187 s 2; 1984 c 7 s 14; 1955 c 150 s 6.]